Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.094

Description of services provided to parents.

The department shall, within existing resources, provide to parents requesting or participating in a multidisciplinary team, family group conference, case conference, or prognostic staffing information that describes these processes prior to the processes being undertaken.

[ 2018 c 284 s 6; 2009 c 520 s 24; 2004 c 147 s 3; 2001 c 332 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 147: See note following RCW 13.34.067.